Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-505
Franchises; contracts authorized; rates.

For the purpose of providing for such sewage disposal plant and sewerage system, or improving or extending such existing system, any such municipality may also enter into a contract with any corporation organized under or authorized by the laws of this state to engage in the business herein mentioned, to receive and treat in the manner hereinbefore mentioned, the sewage and night soil thereof, and to construct, and provide the facilities and services as hereinbefore described. Such contract may also authorize the corporation to charge the owners of the premises served such a service rate therefor as the governing body of such municipality may determine to be just and reasonable, or the municipality may contract to pay the said corporation a flat rate for such service, and pay therefor out of its general fund or the proceeds of any tax levy applicable to the purposes of such contract, or assess the owners of the property served a reasonable charge therefor to be collected as hereinbefore provided and paid into a fund to be used to defray such contract charges.

Laws 1933, c. 146, § 5, p. 562;

Laws 1937, c. 41, § 3, p. 181;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1405;

R.S.1943, § 18-505.